Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 5411.
Duties of the Director.

Generally. The Director shall:

provide general information to applicants for registration as a massage therapist, bodyworker, or touch professional;

receive applications for registration and provide registrations to applicants qualified under this chapter;

administer fees as established by law;

refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer;

explain appeal procedures to applicants and registrants; and

explain complaint procedures to the public.

Rules.

The Director shall adopt rules requiring a massage therapist, bodyworker, or touch professional to disclose to each new client before the first treatment the following information:

the professional qualifications and experience of the registrant;

actions that constitute unprofessional conduct;

the method for filing a complaint against a registrant; and

the method for making a consumer inquiry with the Office.

The Director shall adopt rules regarding the display of:

the registrations of employed or contracted massage therapists, bodyworkers, or touch professionals at an establishment; and

information regarding unprofessional conduct and filing complaints with the Office.

The rules described in this subsection shall include provisions relating to the manner in which the information disclosed shall be distributed or displayed and a requirement that a massage therapist, bodyworker, or touch professional and his or her client sign an acknowledgement that the information was disclosed.

The Director may adopt other rules as necessary to perform his or her duties under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5412.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint three advisors of suitable qualifications, as described in this section, to advise the Director on matters relating to the practice of massage and the practice of bodywork.

The Secretary shall appoint the advisors to serve, at the Secretary’s pleasure, for five-year staggered terms. To stagger the advisors’ terms, the Secretary may initially appoint two of the advisors for less than a five-year term.

Two of the three advisors shall be massage therapists, bodyworkers, or touch professionals registered under this chapter who have been actively engaged in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork, or both, for the three-year period immediately preceding appointment. These two advisors shall maintain their registrations in this State and be actively engaged in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork, or both during their incumbency.

Director shall seek the advice of the advisors in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.